incubator/apertium-pl-sk/apertium-pl-sk.pl.dix
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ia</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="trzec/i__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>i<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__trzeci"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="głup/i__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__trzeci"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>io</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="cpd"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="trzeci"><i>trzec</i><par n="trzec/i__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><i>c</i><par n="trzec/i__det"/></e>
    <e><re>[0-9]+</re><i>-c</i><par n="trzec/i__det"/></e>
